Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2088
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Compensation of directors.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may fix the compensation of directors.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 88.